Arkansas, session 2025, HB1946.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-15-202(f)(46) and (47), concerning the
laws for which public school superintendents may be required to submit a
written statement of assurance that ensures compliance, is amended to read as
follows:
(46) Section 6-17-2803(7) and rules promulgated by the state
board concerning the required training and credentialing of evaluators under
the Teacher Excellence and Support System, § 6-17-2801 et seq.; and
(47) Section 6-16-1008 concerning requirements for certain human
fetal growth and development education; and
(47)(48) Any other statutory mandate for school districts
identified by the division as relevant to the Standards for Accreditation of
Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 16, Subchapter 10, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-16-1008. Human growth and development instruction — Required —
Definition.
*TNL385*
04/01/2025 9:12:13 AM TNL385

HB1946
(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public school
serving students in grades six through twelve (6-12) shall provide
instruction on human growth and development.
(b) The human growth and development instruction required under
subsection (a) of this section shall include without limitation the
following:
(1) A high-definition ultrasound video, at least three (3)
minutes in duration, that shows the development of the brain, heart, sex
organs, and other vital organs in early fetal development; and
(2) A high-quality, computer-generated rendering or animation
that shows the process of fertilization and every stage of human development
inside the uterus, noting significant markers in cell growth and organ
development during each week of pregnancy until birth.
(c) The human growth and development instruction required under this
section shall be included in every class that discusses or provides
instruction concerning:
(1) Human biology;
(2) Contraception; or
(3) Sexually transmitted diseases or sexually transmitted
infections.
(d) As used in this section, "public school" means:
(1) A public school within a public school district; or
(2) An open-enrollment public charter school.













04/01/2025 9:12:13 AM TNL385